Alabama, session 2026rs, HB351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
10 Section 1. This act shall be known as the Alabama
11 Personal Data Protection Act.
12 Section 2. For the purposes of this act, the following
13 terms have the following meanings:
14 (1) AFFILIATE. A legal entity that shares common
15 branding with another legal entity or that controls, is
16 controlled by, or is under common control with another legal
17 entity.
18 (2) AUTHENTICATE. To use reasonable methods to
19 determine that a request to exercise any of the consumer
20 rights afforded under this act is being made by, or on behalf
21 of, a consumer who is entitled to exercise those consumer
22 rights with respect to the consumer's personal data at issue.
23 (3) BIOMETRIC DATA. Data generated by automatic
24 measurements of an individual's biological characteristics,
25 such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, retina, or iris, that are
26 used to identify a specific individual. The term does not
27 include any of the following:
28 a. A digital or physical photograph.
Page 1

a. A digital or physical photograph.
HB351 Enrolled
29 b. An audio or video recording.
30 c. Any data generated from paragraph a. or b. unless
31 the data is used to identify a specific individual.
32 (4) CHILD. An individual under 13 years of age.
33 (5) CONSENT. A clear affirmative act signifying a
34 consumer's freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous
35 agreement to allow the processing of personal data relating to
36 the consumer, including, but not limited to, a written
37 statement or a statement by electronic means. The term does
38 not include any of the following:
39 a. Acceptance of a general or broad term of use or
40 similar document that contains descriptions of personal data
41 processing along with other unrelated information.
42 b. Hovering over, muting, or pausing a given piece of
43 content.
44 c. An agreement obtained using dark patterns.
45 (6) CONSUMER. An individual who is a resident of this
46 state. The term does not include an individual acting in a
47 commercial or employment context or as an employee, owner,
48 director, officer, or contractor of a company, partnership,
49 sole proprietorship, nonprofit, or government agency whose
50 communications or transactions with the controller occur
51 solely within the context of that individual's role with the
52 company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit, or
53 government agency.
54 (7) CONTROL. Any of the following:
55 a. Ownership of or the power to vote more than 50
56 percent of the outstanding shares of any class of voting
Page 2

percent of the outstanding shares of any class of voting
HB351 Enrolled
57 security of a company.
58 b. Control in any manner over the election of a
59 majority of the directors or of individuals exercising similar
60 functions.
61 c. The power to exercise controlling influence over the
62 management of a company.
63 (8) CONTROLLER. An individual or legal entity that,
64 alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and
65 means of processing personal data.
66 (9) DARK PATTERN. A user interface designed or
67 manipulated with the effect of substantially subverting or
68 impairing user autonomy, decision-making, or choice.
69 (10) DEIDENTIFIED DATA. Data that cannot be used to
70 reasonably infer information about or otherwise be linked to
71 an identified or identifiable individual or a device linked to
72 an identified or identifiable individual if the controller
73 that possesses the data does all of the following:
74 a. Takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data
75 cannot be associated with an individual.
76 b. Publicly commits to process the data in a
77 deidentified fashion only and to not attempt to reidentify the
78 data.
79 c. Contractually obligates any recipients of the data
80 to satisfy the criteria set forth in Section 11(a) and (b).
81 (11) IDENTIFIABLE INDIVIDUAL. An individual who can be
82 readily identified, directly or indirectly.
83 (12) NONPROFIT ENTITY. As defined in Section
84 10A-1-1.03, Code of Alabama 1975.
Page 3

10A-1-1.03, Code of Alabama 1975.
HB351 Enrolled
85 (13) PERSONAL DATA. Any information that is linked or
86 reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable
87 individual. The term does not include deidentified data or
88 publicly available information.
89 (14) PRECISE GEOLOCATION DATA. Information derived from
90 technology, including, but not limited to, global positioning
91 system level latitude and longitude coordinates, which
92 directly identifies the specific location of an individual
93 with precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet. The
94 term does not include the content of communications or any
95 data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering
96 infrastructure systems or equipment for use by a utility.
97 (15) PROCESS. Any operation or set of operations,
98 whether by manual or automated means, performed on personal
99 data or on sets of personal data, including, but not limited
100 to, the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis,
101 deletion, or modification of personal data.
102 (16) PROCESSOR. An individual or legal entity that
103 processes personal data on behalf of a controller.
104 (17) PROFILING. Any form of solely-automated processing
105 performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict
106 personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable
107 individual's economic situation, health, personal preferences,
108 interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.
109 (18) PSEUDONYMOUS DATA. Personal data that cannot be
110 attributed to a specific individual without the use of
111 additional information, provided the additional information is
112 kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical and
Page 4

kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical and
HB351 Enrolled
113 organizational measures to ensure that the personal data is
114 not attributable to an identified or identifiable individual.
115 (19) PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION. Either of the
116 following:
117 a. Information that is lawfully made available through
118 federal, state, or local government records or widely
119 distributed media.
120 b. Information that a controller has a reasonable basis
121 to believe a consumer has lawfully made available to the
122 public.
123 (20) SALE OF PERSONAL DATA. The exchange of personal
124 data for monetary consideration by a controller to a third
125 party, or for other valuable consideration by a controller to
126 a third party where the controller receives a material benefit
127 and the third party is not restricted in its subsequent uses
128 of the personal data. The term does not include any of the
129 following:
130 a. The disclosure of personal data to a processor that
131 processes the personal data on behalf of the controller.
132 b. The disclosure of personal data to a third party for
133 the purposes of providing a product or service requested by
134 the consumer.
135 c. The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an
136 affiliate of the controller.
137 d. The disclosure of personal data in which the
138 consumer directs the controller to disclose the personal data
139 or intentionally uses the controller to interact with a third
140 party.
Page 5

party.
HB351 Enrolled
141 e. The disclosure of personal data that the consumer
142 intentionally made available to the public via a channel of
143 mass media and did not restrict to a specific audience.
144 f. The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a
145 third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition,
146 bankruptcy, or other transaction, or a proposed merger,
147 acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction in which the
148 third party assumes control of all or part of the controller's
149 assets.
150 g. The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a
151 third party for the purposes of providing analytics services.
152 h. The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a
153 third party for the purposes of providing marketing services
154 solely to the controller.
155 (21) SENSITIVE DATA. Personal data that includes any of
156 the following:
157 a. Data revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious
158 beliefs, a mental or physical health condition or diagnosis,
159 information about an individual's sex life, sexual
160 orientation, or citizenship or immigration status.
161 b. The processing of genetic or biometric data for the
162 purpose of uniquely identifying an individual.
163 c. Personal data collected from a known child.
164 d. Precise geolocation data.
165 (22) SIGNIFICANT DECISION. A decision made by a
166 controller that results in the provision or denial by the
167 controller of credit or lending services, housing, insurance,
168 education enrollment or opportunity, criminal justice,
Page 6

education enrollment or opportunity, criminal justice,
HB351 Enrolled
169 employment opportunity, health care service, or access to
170 basic necessities such as food or water.
171 (23) TARGETED ADVERTISING. Displaying advertisements to
172 a consumer in which the advertisement is selected based on
173 personal data obtained or inferred from that consumer's
174 activities over time and across nonaffiliated Internet
175 websites or online applications to predict the consumer's
176 preferences or interests. The term does not include any of the
177 following:
178 a. Advertisements based on activities within a
179 controller's own Internet websites or online applications.
180 b. Advertisements based on the context of a consumer's
181 current search query or visit to any Internet website or
182 online application.
183 c. Advertisements directed to a consumer in response to
184 the consumer's request for information or feedback.
185 d. Processing personal data solely to measure or report
186 advertising frequency, performance, or reach.
187 (24) THIRD PARTY. An individual or legal entity other
188 than a consumer, controller, processor, or an affiliate of the
189 controller or processor.
190 (25) TRADE SECRET. As defined in Section 8-27-2, Code
191 of Alabama 1975.
192 Section 3. The provisions of this act apply to persons
193 that conduct business in this state or persons that produce
194 products or services that are targeted to residents of this
195 state and that meet either of the following qualifications:
196 (1) Control or process the personal data of more than
Page 7

(1) Control or process the personal data of more than
HB351 Enrolled
197 25,000 consumers, excluding personal data controlled or
198 processed solely for the purpose of completing a payment
199 transaction.
200 (2) Derive more than 25 percent of gross revenue from
201 the sale of personal data, regardless of the number of
202 consumers whose data the person controls or processes.
203 Section 4. (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of
204 this act, this act shall not apply to any of the following:
205 (1)a. A political subdivision of the state.
206 b. Any board, authority, district, or public
207 corporation organized pursuant to Title 11, Code of Alabama
208 1975, or Chapter 7 of Title 39, Code of Alabama 1975.
209 (2) A two-year or four-year institution of higher
210 education, including affiliates of a two-year or four-year
211 institution of higher education.
212 (3) A national securities association that is
213 registered under 15 U.S.C. § 78o-3.
214 (4) A financial institution or an affiliate of a
215 financial institution governed by 15 U.S.C. Chapter 94.
216 (5) A financial institution or an affiliate of a
217 financial institution governed by, or personal data collected,
218 processed, sold, or disclosed in accordance with Title V of
219 the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 U.S.C. § 6801 et. seq.
220 (6) A covered entity or business associate as defined
221 in the privacy regulations of 45 C.F.R. § 160.103.
222 (7) A business, including an organization cooperatively
223 organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37, Code of Alabama 1975,
224 or an entity that is an instrumentality of a municipal
Page 8

or an entity that is an instrumentality of a municipal
HB351 Enrolled
225 corporation, with fewer than 500 employees, provided the
226 business does not engage in the sale of personal data.
227 (8) A nonprofit entity, as defined in Section
228 10A-1-1.03, Code of Alabama 1975, with less than 100
229 employees, provided the entity does not engage in the sale of
230 personal data.
231 (9) Any person or entity regulated by Chapter 6 of
232 Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975.
233 (10) Any person or entity regulated by Chapter 7A of
234 Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975.
235 (11) Any trade association explicitly authorized to
236 receive documents or evidence pursuant to Section 27-12A-23,
237 Code of Alabama 1975.
238 (12)a. A political action committee, political party,
239 or principal campaign committee, as defined in Section 17-5-2,
240 Code of Alabama 1975, or any political organization as defined
241 in 26 U.S.C. §527.
242 b. A business entity that sells data primarily to a
243 political action committee, political party, or principal
244 campaign committee, as defined in Section 17-5-2, Code of
245 Alabama 1975, or any political organization as defined in 26
246 U.S.C. §527.
247 (13) An electric provider as defined under Chapter 16
248 of Title 37, Code of Alabama 1975, that is subject to the
249 requirements or reliability standards of the North American
250 Electric Reliability Corporation.
251 (b) This act shall not apply to any of the following
252 information or data:
Page 9

information or data:
HB351 Enrolled
253 (1) Protected health information under the privacy
254 regulations of the federal Health Insurance Portability and
255 Accountability Act of 1996 and related regulations.
256 (2) Patient-identifying information for the purposes of
257 42 C.F.R. Part 2, established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2.
258 (3) Identifiable private information for the purposes
259 of 45 C.F.R. Part 46.
260 (4) Identifiable private information that is otherwise
261 collected as part of human subjects research pursuant to the
262 good clinical practice guidelines issued by the International
263 Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for
264 Pharmaceuticals for Human Use.
265 (5) The protection of human subjects under 21 C.F.R.
266 Parts 50 and 56, or personal data used or shared in research
267 as defined in the federal Health Insurance Portability and
268 Accountability Act of 1996 and 45 C.F.R. § 164.501, that is
269 conducted in accordance with applicable law.
270 (6) Information or documents created for the purposes
271 of the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986.
272 (7) Patient safety work products for the purposes of
273 the federal Patient Safety and Quality Improvement Act of
274 2005.
275 (8) Information derived from any of the health care
276 related information listed in this subsection which is
277 deidentified in accordance with the requirements for
278 deidentification pursuant to the privacy regulations of the
279 federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
280 1996.
Page 10

1996.
HB351 Enrolled
281 (9) Information derived from any of the health care
282 related information listed in this subsection which is
283 included in a limited data set as described in 45 C.F.R. §
284 164.514(e), to the extent that the information is used,
285 disclosed, and maintained in a manner specified in 45 C.F.R. §
286 164.514(e).
287 (10) Information originating from and intermingled to
288 be indistinguishable with or information treated in the same
289 manner as information exempt under this subsection which is
290 maintained by a covered entity or business associate as
291 defined in the privacy regulations of the federal Health
292 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 or a
293 program or qualified service organization as specified in 42
294 U.S.C. § 290dd-2.
295 (11) Information used for public health activities and
296 purposes as authorized by the federal Health Insurance
297 Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, community health
298 activities, and population health activities.
299 (12) The collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale,
300 communication, or use of any personal information bearing on a
301 consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing, credit
302 capacity, character, general reputation, personal
303 characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer reporting
304 agency, furnisher, or user that provides information for use
305 in a consumer report and by a user of a consumer report, but
306 only to the extent that the activity is regulated by and
307 authorized under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act.
308 (13) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or
Page 11

(13) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or
HB351 Enrolled
309 disclosed in compliance with the federal Driver's Privacy
310 Protection Act of 1994.
311 (14) Personal data regulated by the federal Family
312 Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974.
313 (15) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or
314 disclosed in compliance with the federal Farm Credit Act of
315 1971.
316 (16) Data processed or maintained by an individual
317 applying to, employed by, or acting as an agent or independent
318 contractor of a controller, processor, or third party to the
319 extent that the data is collected and used within the context
320 of that role.
321 (17) Data processed or maintained as the emergency
322 contact information of an individual under this act and used
323 for emergency contact purposes.
324 (18) Data processed or maintained that is necessary to
325 retain to administer benefits for another individual relating
326 to the individual who is the subject of the information under
327 this section and is used for the purposes of administering the
328 benefits.
329 (19) Personal data collected, processed, sold, or
330 disclosed in relation to price, route, or service, as these
331 terms are used in the federal Airline Deregulation Act of 1978
332 by an air carrier subject to the act.
333 (20) Data or information collected or processed to
334 comply with or in accordance with state law.
335 (21) Personal data collected or used pursuant to 21
336 U.S.C. § 830.
Page 12

U.S.C. § 830.
HB351 Enrolled
337 (c) Controllers and processors that comply with the
338 verifiable parental consent requirements of the federal
339 Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998 are compliant
340 with any obligation to obtain parental consent pursuant to
341 this act.
342 Section 5. (a) Subject to authentication and any other
343 conditions or limitations provided by this act, a consumer may
344 invoke the rights authorized pursuant to this subsection at
345 any time by submitting a request to a controller specifying
346 the consumer right the consumer seeks to invoke. A controller
347 shall comply with an authenticated request to do any of the
348 following:
349 (1) Confirm whether a controller, or a processor or
350 third party acting on a controller's behalf, is processing the
351 consumer's personal data and accessing any of the consumer's
352 personal data under the control of the controller, unless
353 confirmation or access would require the controller to reveal
354 a trade secret.
355 (2) Correct inaccuracies in the consumer's personal
356 data, considering the nature of the personal data and the
357 purposes of the processing of the consumer's personal data.
358 (3) Direct a controller to delete the consumer's
359 personal data.
360 (4) Obtain a copy of the consumer's personal data
361 previously provided by the consumer to a controller in a
362 portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily
363 usable format that allows the consumer to transmit the
364 personal data to another controller without hindrance when the
Page 13

personal data to another controller without hindrance when the
HB351 Enrolled
365 processing is carried out by automated means, unless the
366 provision of the data would require the controller to reveal a
367 trade secret.
368 (5) Opt out of the processing of the consumer's
369 personal data for any of the following purposes:
370 a. Targeted advertising.
371 b. The sale of the consumer's personal data.
372 c. Profiling in furtherance of solely automated
373 significant decisions concerning the consumer.
374 (b) A controller shall establish a secure and reliable
375 method for a consumer to exercise rights established by this
376 section and shall describe the method in the controller's
377 privacy notice.
378 (c)(1) A parent or legal guardian of a known child may
379 exercise the consumer's rights on behalf of the known child
380 regarding the processing of personal data.
381 (2) A guardian or conservator of a consumer may
382 exercise the consumer's rights on behalf of the consumer
383 regarding the processing of personal data.
384 (d) Except as otherwise provided in this act, a
385 controller shall comply with a request by a consumer to
386 exercise the consumer's rights authorized by this section as
387 follows:
388 (1)a. A controller shall respond to a consumer's
389 request within 45 days of receipt of the request.
390 b. A controller may extend the response period by 45
391 additional days, when reasonably necessary considering the
392 complexity and number of the consumer's requests, by notifying
Page 14

complexity and number of the consumer's requests, by notifying
HB351 Enrolled
393 the consumer of the extension and the reason for the extension
394 within the initial 45-day response period.
395 (2) If a controller declines to act regarding a
396 consumer's request, the controller shall inform the consumer
397 of the justification for declining to act within 45 days of
398 receipt of the request.
399 (3) Information provided in response to a consumer
400 request must be provided by a controller, free of charge, once
401 for each consumer during any 12-month period. If a consumer's
402 requests are manifestly unfounded, excessive, technically
403 infeasible, or repetitive, the controller may charge the
404 consumer a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of
405 complying with a request or decline to act on a request. Upon
406 inquiry by an enforcement authority, the controller bears the
407 burden of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded, excessive,
408 technically infeasible, or repetitive nature of a request.
409 (4) If a controller is unable to authenticate a
410 consumer's request using commercially reasonable efforts, the
411 controller shall not be required to comply with a request to
412 initiate an action pursuant to this section and shall provide
413 notice to the consumer that the controller is unable to
414 authenticate the request until the consumer provides
415 additional information reasonably necessary to authenticate
416 the consumer and the request. A controller is not required to
417 authenticate an opt-out request, but a controller may deny an
418 opt-out request if the controller has a good faith,
419 reasonable, and documented belief that the request is
420 fraudulent or otherwise not authorized. If a controller denies
Page 15

fraudulent or otherwise not authorized. If a controller denies
HB351 Enrolled
421 an opt-out request because the controller believes the request
422 is fraudulent or not authorized, the controller shall send
423 notice to the person who made the request disclosing that the
424 controller believes the request is fraudulent or not
425 authorized and that the controller may not comply with the
426 request.
427 (5) A controller that has obtained personal data about
428 a consumer from a source other than the consumer is in
429 compliance with a consumer's request to delete the consumer's
430 data if the controller has done either of the following:
431 a. Retained a record of the deletion request and the
432 minimum data necessary for the purpose of ensuring the
433 consumer's personal data remains deleted from the controller's
434 records and refrains from using the retained data for any
435 other purpose.
436 b. Opted the consumer out of any further processing of
437 the consumer's personal data for any purpose except for those
438 exempted pursuant to this act.
439 Section 6. (a) A parent or legal guardian of a known
440 child or a guardian or conservator of a consumer may act on
441 the known child's or the consumer's behalf to opt out of the
442 processing of the known child's or the consumer's personal
443 data for one or more of the purposes specified in Section 5.
444 (b) A controller must allow a consumer to opt-out by
445 providing a clear and conspicuous link on the controller's
446 Internet website to an Internet web page that enables a
447 consumer directly to opt out of any processing of the
448 consumer's personal data for the purposes of targeted
Page 16

consumer's personal data for the purposes of targeted
HB351 Enrolled
449 advertising or sale of the consumer's personal data, or
450 provides up-to-date contact information for a consumer to
451 submit the opt-out request.
452 (c)(1) If a consumer's decision to opt out of any
453 processing of the consumer's personal data for the purposes of
454 targeted advertising, or any sale of personal data, through an
455 opt-out preference signal sent in accordance with this section
456 conflicts with the consumer's existing controller-specific
457 privacy setting or voluntary participation in a controller's
458 bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts, or
459 club card program, the controller shall comply with the
460 consumer's opt-out preference signal but may notify the
461 consumer of the conflict and provide the choice to confirm
462 controller-specific privacy settings or participation in such
463 a program.
464 (2) If a controller responds to consumer opt-out
465 requests received in accordance with this section by informing
466 the consumer of a charge for the use of any product or
467 service, the controller shall present the terms of any
468 financial incentive offered pursuant to this section for the
469 retention, use, sale, or sharing of the consumer's personal
470 data.
471 Section 7. (a) A controller shall do all of the
472 following:
473 (1) Limit the collection of personal data to what is
474 adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in relation to
475 the purposes for which the personal data is processed.
476 (2) Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable
Page 17

(2) Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable
HB351 Enrolled
477 administrative, technical, and physical data security
478 practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and
479 accessibility of personal data appropriate to the volume and
480 nature of the personal data at issue.
481 (3) Provide an effective mechanism for a consumer to
482 revoke the consumer's consent under this act that is at least
483 as easy as the mechanism by which the consumer provided the
484 consumer's consent and, on revocation of the consent, cease to
485 further process the personal data as soon as practicable, but
486 no later than 45 days after complying with the consumer's
487 opt-out request consistent with this act.
488 (b) A controller may not do any of the following:
489 (1) Except as provided in this act, process personal
490 data for purposes that are not reasonably necessary to or
491 compatible with the disclosed purposes for which the personal
492 data is processed as disclosed by the controller.
493 (2) Process sensitive data concerning a consumer other
494 than a known child without obtaining that consumer's consent
495 or, in the case of the processing of personal data concerning
496 a known child, without processing the data in accordance with
497 the federal Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998,
498 15 U.S.C. § 6501 et seq.
499 (3) Process personal data in violation of the laws of
500 this state or federal laws that prohibit unlawful
501 discrimination against consumers.
502 (4) Process the personal data of a consumer for the
503 purposes of targeted advertising or sell a consumer's personal
504 data without the consumer's consent under circumstances in
Page 18

data without the consumer's consent under circumstances in
HB351 Enrolled
505 which a controller has actual knowledge that the consumer is
506 at least 13 years of age but younger than 16 years of age.
507 (5) Deny goods or services, charge different prices or
508 rates for goods or services, or provide a different level of
509 quality of goods or services to a consumer if the consumer
510 opts out of the processing of the consumer's data. However, if
511 a consumer opts out of data processing, the covered entity is
512 not required to provide a service that requires data
513 processing. Controllers may provide different prices or levels
514 for goods or services if the good or service is a bona fide
515 loyalty, rewards, premium features, discount, or club card
516 program in which a consumer voluntarily participates.
517 (c) If a controller sells personal data to third
518 parties or processes personal data for targeted advertising,
519 the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the
520 processing, as well as the way a consumer may exercise the
521 right to opt out of the processing.
522 (d) A controller shall provide consumers with a
523 reasonably accurate, clear, and meaningful privacy notice that
524 includes all of the following:
525 (1) The categories of personal data processed by the
526 controller.
527 (2) The purpose for processing personal data.
528 (3) The categories of personal data that the controller
529 shares with third parties, if any.
530 (4) The categories of third parties, if any, with which
531 the controller shares personal data.
532 (5) An active email address or other mechanism that the
Page 19

(5) An active email address or other mechanism that the
HB351 Enrolled
533 consumer may use to contact the controller.
534 (6) How consumers may exercise their consumer rights,
535 including a link or contact information for availing
536 themselves of the opt-out method provided in Section 6.
537 (e)(1) A controller shall establish and describe in a
538 privacy notice one or more secure and reliable means for
539 consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer
540 rights, as established under Section 5, pursuant to this act
541 considering the ways in which consumers normally interact with
542 the controller, the need for secure and reliable communication
543 of consumer requests, and the ability of the controller to
544 authenticate the identity of the consumer or authorized agent
545 making the request.
546 (2) A controller may not require a consumer to create a
547 new account to exercise consumer rights but may require a
548 consumer to use an existing account as a means of exercising
549 his or her consumer rights.
550 (f) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any
551 kind that purports to waive or limit in any way a consumer's
552 consumer rights as established under this act shall be deemed
553 contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.
554 Section 8. (a) A processor shall adhere to the
555 instructions of a controller and shall assist the controller
556 in meeting the controller's obligations under this act,
557 considering the nature of processing and the information
558 available to the processor, including, but not limited to,
559 both of the following:
560 (1) Maintaining appropriate and reasonably practical
Page 20

(1) Maintaining appropriate and reasonably practical
HB351 Enrolled
561 technical and organizational measures to support the
562 fulfillment of the controller's obligation to respond to
563 consumer rights requests.
564 (2) Assisting the controller in meeting the
565 controller's obligations in relation to the security of
566 processing the personal data and in relation to the
567 notification of a breach of security of the system of the
568 processor to meet both the controller's and the processor's
569 obligations.
570 (b)(1) A contract between a controller and a processor
571 shall govern the processor's data processing obligations with
572 respect to processing performed on behalf of the controller.
573 (2) The contract shall:
574 a. Be binding;
575 b. Clearly set forth instructions for processing data;
576 c. Clearly set forth the nature and purpose of the
577 processing;
578 d. Clearly set forth the type of data subject to
579 processing;
580 e. Clearly set forth the duration of processing; and
581 f. Clearly set forth the rights and obligations of both
582 parties.
583 (3) The contract, taking into account the nature of the
584 processing, the relationship between the parties, and other
585 factors, shall also require the processor to:
586 a. Ensure that each processor of personal data is
587 subject to a duty of confidentiality with respect to the
588 personal data;
Page 21

personal data;
HB351 Enrolled
589 b. Delete or return all personal data to the controller
590 as requested at the end of the provision of services at the
591 controller's direction, unless retention of the personal data
592 is required or permitted by law or the contract;
593 c. Make available to the controller all information in
594 the processor's possession necessary to demonstrate the
595 processor's compliance with the obligations of this act upon
596 the reasonable request of the controller; and
597 d. Obligate any subcontractor processing personal data
598 to meet the obligations of the processor with respect to the
599 personal data.
600 (c) Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve
601 a controller or processor from the liabilities imposed on the
602 controller or processor by virtue of the controller's or
603 processor's role in the processing relationship as described
604 in this act.
605 (d) Determining whether a person is acting as a
606 controller or processor with respect to a specific processing
607 of data is a fact-based determination that depends on the
608 following context in which personal data is to be processed:
609 (1) A person who is not limited in the processing of
610 personal data pursuant to a controller's instructions or who
611 fails to adhere to a controller's instructions is a controller
612 and not a processor with respect to a specific processing of
613 data.
614 (2) A processor that continues to adhere to a
615 controller's instructions with respect to a specific
616 processing of personal data remains a processor.
Page 22

processing of personal data remains a processor.
HB351 Enrolled
617 (3) If a processor begins, alone or jointly with
618 others, determining the purposes and means of the processing
619 of personal data, the processor is a controller with respect
620 to the processing and may be subject to an enforcement action
621 under this act.
622 Section 9. (a) Any controller in possession of
623 deidentified data shall do all of the following:
624 (1) Take measures to ensure that the deidentified data
625 cannot reasonably be associated with an individual.
626 (2) Refrain from reidentifying the deidentified data
627 when maintaining and using deidentified data.
628 (3) Contractually obligate any recipients of the
629 deidentified data to comply with all provisions of this
630 section.
631 (b) Nothing in this act may be construed to require a
632 controller to do any of the following:
633 (1) Reidentify deidentified data or pseudonymous data.
634 (2) Maintain deidentified data in an identifiable form.
635 (3) Collect, obtain, retain, or access any identifiable
636 data associated with deidentified data solely for purposes of
637 authenticating a potential consumer request regarding personal
638 data.
639 (c) Nothing in this act may be construed to require a
640 controller or processor to comply with an authenticated
641 consumer rights request if the controller or processor:
642 (1) Is not reasonably capable of associating the
643 request with the personal data or it would be unreasonably
644 burdensome to associate the request with the personal data;
Page 23

burdensome to associate the request with the personal data;
HB351 Enrolled
645 (2) Does not use the personal data to recognize or
646 respond to the specific consumer who is the subject of the
647 personal data or associate the personal data with other
648 personal data about the same specific consumer; and
649 (3) Does not sell the personal data to any third party
650 or otherwise voluntarily disclose the personal data to any
651 third party other than a processor or subprocessor, except as
652 otherwise permitted in this section.
653 (d) The rights afforded under Section 5 may not apply
654 to pseudonymous data in cases in which the controller is able
655 to demonstrate that any information necessary to identify the
656 consumer is kept separately and is subject to effective
657 technical and organizational controls that prevent the
658 controller from accessing the information.
659 (e) A controller that discloses pseudonymous data or
660 deidentified data shall exercise reasonable oversight to
661 monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which
662 the pseudonymous data or deidentified data is subject and
663 shall take appropriate steps to address any breaches of those
664 contractual commitments.
665 Section 10. (a) Nothing in this act may be construed to
666 restrict a controller's or processor's ability to do any of
667 the following:
668 (1) Comply with federal, state, or local ordinances or
669 regulations.
670 (2) Comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory
671 inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal,
672 state, local, or other government authority.
Page 24

state, local, or other government authority.
HB351 Enrolled
673 (3) Cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning
674 conduct or activity that the controller or processor
675 reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal,
676 state, or local ordinances, rules, or regulations.
677 (4) Investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or
678 defend legal claims, or otherwise protect the legal rights of
679 the controller or processor.
680 (5) Provide a product or service specifically requested
681 by a consumer.
682 (6) Perform under a contract to which a consumer is a
683 party, including fulfilling the terms of a written warranty.
684 (7) Take steps at the request of a consumer prior to
685 entering a contract.
686 (8) Take immediate steps to protect an interest that is
687 essential for the life or physical safety of the consumer or
688 another individual and when the processing cannot be
689 manifestly based on another legal basis.
690 (9) Prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to
691 security incidents; identify theft, including identity theft,
692 fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive activities, or any
693 illegal activity; preserve the integrity or security of
694 systems; or investigate, report, or prosecute those
695 responsible for any of these actions.
696 (10) Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or
697 statistical research in the public interest that adheres to
698 all other applicable ethics and privacy laws and is approved,
699 monitored, and governed by an institutional review board that
700 determines, or similar independent oversight entities that
Page 25

determines, or similar independent oversight entities that
HB351 Enrolled
701 determine, all of the following:
702 a. Whether the deletion of the information is likely to
703 provide substantial benefits that do not exclusively accrue to
704 the controller.
705 b. The expected benefits of the research outweigh the
706 privacy risks.
707 c. Whether the controller has implemented reasonable
708 safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with research,
709 including any risks associated with reidentification.
710 (11) Assist another controller, processor, or third
711 party with any of the obligations under this act.
712 (12) Process personal data for reasons of public
713 interest in public health, community health, or population
714 health, but solely to the extent that the processing is both
715 of the following:
716 a. Subject to suitable and specific measures to
717 safeguard the rights of the consumer whose personal data is
718 being processed.
719 b. Under the responsibility of a professional subject
720 to confidentiality obligations under federal, state, or local
721 law.
722 (b) The obligations imposed on controllers or
723 processors under this act may not restrict a controller's or
724 processor's ability to collect, use, or retain personal data
725 for internal use to do any of the following:
726 (1) Conduct internal research to develop, improve, or
727 repair products, services, or technology.
728 (2) Effectuate a product recall.
Page 26

(2) Effectuate a product recall.
HB351 Enrolled
729 (3) Identify and repair technical errors that impair
730 existing or intended functionality.
731 (4) Perform internal operations that are reasonably
732 aligned with the expectations of the consumer or reasonably
733 anticipated based on the consumer's existing relationship with
734 the controller or are otherwise compatible with processing
735 data in furtherance of the provision of a product or service
736 specifically requested by a consumer or the performance of a
737 contract to which the consumer is a party.
738 (c) The obligations imposed on controllers or
739 processors under this act may not apply when compliance by the
740 controller or processor with this act would violate an
741 evidentiary privilege under the laws of this state. Nothing in
742 this act may be construed to prevent a controller or processor
743 from providing personal data concerning a consumer to a person
744 covered by an evidentiary privilege under the laws of this
745 state as part of a privileged communication.
746 (d)(1) If, at the time a controller or processor
747 discloses personal data to a processor or third-party
748 controller in accordance with this act, the controller or
749 processor did not have actual knowledge that the processor or
750 third-party controller would violate this act, then the
751 controller or processor may not be considered to have violated
752 this act.
753 (2) A receiving processor or third-party controller
754 receiving personal data from a disclosing controller or
755 processor in compliance with this act is likewise not in
756 violation of this act for the transgressions of the disclosing
Page 27

violation of this act for the transgressions of the disclosing
HB351 Enrolled
757 controller or processor from which the receiving processor or
758 third-party controller receives the personal data.
759 (e) Nothing in this act may be construed to do either
760 of the following:
761 (1) Impose any obligation on a controller or processor
762 that adversely affects the rights or freedoms of any person.
763 (2) Apply to a person's processing of personal data
764 during the person's personal or household activities.
765 (f) Personal data processed by a controller pursuant to
766 this section may be processed to the extent that the
767 processing is both of the following:
768 (1) Reasonably necessary and proportionate to the
769 purposes listed in this section.
770 (2) Adequate, relevant, and limited to what is
771 necessary in relation to the specific purposes listed in this
772 section. The controller or processor must, when applicable,
773 consider the nature and purpose of the collection, use, or
774 retention of the personal data collected, used, or retained
775 pursuant to this section. The personal data must be subject to
776 reasonable administrative, technical, and physical measures to
777 protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of
778 the personal data and to reduce reasonably foreseeable risks
779 of harm to consumers relating to the collection, use, or
780 retention of personal data.
781 (g) If a controller processes personal data pursuant to
782 an exemption in this section, the controller bears the burden
783 of demonstrating that the processing qualifies for the
784 exemption and complies with the requirements in this section.
Page 28

exemption and complies with the requirements in this section.
HB351 Enrolled
785 (h) Processing personal data for the purposes expressly
786 identified in this section may not solely make a legal entity
787 a controller with respect to the processing.
788 Section 11. (a) The Attorney General may enforce
789 violations of this act.
790 (b)(1) The Attorney General, prior to initiating any
791 action for a violation of any provision of this act, shall
792 issue a notice of violation to the controller.
793 (2) If the controller fails to correct the violation
794 within 45 days after receipt of the notice of violation, the
795 Attorney General may bring an action for an injunction
796 pursuant to this section. Upon a finding that the controller
797 has violated this act and failed to correct the violation as
798 required by this section, the court may assess a civil penalty
799 of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per
800 violation.
801 (3) If within the 45-day period the controller corrects
802 the noticed violation and provides the Attorney General an
803 express written statement that the alleged violations have
804 been corrected and that no such further violations will occur,
805 no action may be initiated against the controller.
806 Section 12. This act shall become effective on May 1,
807 2027.
Page 29

2027.
HB351 Enrolled
808
809
810
811
812
813
814
815
816
817
818 ________________________________________________
819 Speaker of the House of Representatives
820
821
822
823 ________________________________________________
824 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
825
826
827 House of Representatives
828
829 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
830 was passed by the House 24-Feb-26, as amended.
831
832 John Treadwell
833 Clerk
834
835
836
837
838
839 Senate 07-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
840
841 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
842 Amendment
843
844
Page 30